apertium-arz.arz.dix
    <pardef n="n__فيلم">
      <e><p><l>فيلم</l><r>فيلم<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>فيلمين</l><r>فيلم<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>افلام</l><r>فيلم<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__دق/يقة">
      <e><p><l>يقة</l><r>يقة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يقتين</l><r>يقة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ايق</l><r>يقة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__خر/يطة">
      <e><p><l>يطة</l><r>يطة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يطتين</l><r>يطة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ايط</l><r>يطة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__مك/تب">
      <e><p><l>تب</l><r>تب<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تبين</l><r>تب<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اتب</l><r>تب<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__حج/ز">
      <e><p><l>ز</l><r>ز<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>زين</l><r>ز<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>وزات</l><r>ز<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__قط/ر">
      <e><p><l>ر</l><r>ر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>رين</l><r>ر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ورات</l><r>ر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__كر/سي">
      <e><p><l>سي</l><r>سي<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سيين</l><r>سي<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اسي</l><r>سي<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__دك/تور">
      <e><p><l>تور</l><r>تور<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تورة</l><r>تور<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تورين</l><r>تور<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تورتين</l><r>تور<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اترة</l><r>تور<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n__بي/ت">
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تين</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>وت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ال__det">
      <e><p><l>ال</l><r>ال<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ف__preposition">
      <e><p><l>ف</l><r>في<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ع__preposition">
      <e><p><l>ع</l><r>على<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ل__preposition">
      <e><p><l>ل</l><r>الى<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ب__preposition">
      <e><p><l>ب</l><r>ب<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="noun_procilitics">
      <e><p><l/><r/></p></e>
      <e><par n="ال__det"/></e>
      <e><par n="ف__preposition"/><par n="ال__det"/></e>
      <e><par n="ع__preposition"/><par n="ال__det"/></e>
      <e><par n="ب__preposition"/></e>
      <e><par n="ب__preposition"/><par n="ال__det"/></e>
      <e><par n="ل__preposition"/></e>
      <e><par n="ل__preposition"/><p><l>ل</l><r>ال<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="preposition">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="من" c="from"><i>من</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="الى" c="to"><i>الى</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="في" c="in"><i>في</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="على" c="on"><i>على</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="مع" c="with"><i>مع</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="عن" c="about"><i>عن</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="ل" c="for"><i>ل</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="ماعدا" c="except"><i>ماعدا</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="خلال" c="through"><i>خلال</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="قبل" c="before"><i>قبل</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="بعد" c="after"><i>بعد</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="قدام" c="in front of"><i>قدام</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="وسط" c="in the middle of"><i>وسط</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="ورا" c="behind"><i>ورا</i><par n="preposition"/></e>
    <e lm="فلوس" c="money"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>فلوس</i><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e lm="دقيقة" c="minute"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>دق</i><par n="n__دق/يقة"/></e>
    <e lm="خريطة" c="map"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>خر</i><par n="n__خر/يطة"/></e>
    <e lm="مكتب" c="desk"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>مك</i><par n="n__مك/تب"/></e>
    <e lm="قطر" c="train"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>قط</i><par n="n__قط/ر"/></e>
    <e lm="حجز" c="reservation"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>حج</i><par n="n__حج/ز"/></e>
    <e lm="كرسي" c="chair"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>كر</i><par n="n__كر/سي"/></e>
    <e lm="دكتور" c="doctor"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>دك</i><par n="n__دك/تور"/></e>
    <e lm="برد" c="cold"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><i>برد</i><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e lm="فيلم" c="film"><par n="noun_procilitics"/><par n="n__فيلم"/></e>
